Hawaii statutes.
[§201H‑86] Low-income housing tax
credit loan. (a) The corporation may provide a no-interest low-income
housing tax credit loan to an owner of a qualified low-income building that has
been awarded federal tax credits that are subject to the state housing credit
ceiling under section 42(h)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, federal credits
that are allocated pursuant to section 42(h)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code,
or a subaward under section 1602 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act
of 2009, Public Law 111-5. The loan shall be in an amount equal to seventy per
cent of the cash value of the amount of the low-income housing tax credit that
would otherwise have been claimable with respect to the qualified low-income
building under section 235-110.8 for each taxable year in the ten-year credit
period, discounted to present day value and capitalized at the rate of interest
on the taxable general obligation bonds used to fund the loan.

(b) An owner who is provided a low-income
housing tax credit loan under this section shall not be eligible for the state
income tax credit under section 235-110.8.

(c) The corporation shall impose conditions or
restrictions on the low-income housing tax credit loan, including:

(1) A requirement providing for acceleration and
repayment on any no-interest loan under this section to assure that the
building with respect to which the loan is made remains a qualified low-income
building under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code or section 1602 of the
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Public Law 111-5. Any such
repayment shall be payable to the housing finance revolving fund and may be
enforced by means of liens or other methods as the corporation deems
appropriate;

(2) The same limitations on rent, income, and use
restrictions as applied under an allocation of a housing credit dollar amount
allocated under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code; and

(3) The payment of reasonable fees for the
corporation to perform or cause to be performed asset management functions to
ensure compliance with section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code and the
long-term viability of buildings funded by any no-interest loan under this
section.

(d) The corporation shall perform asset
management functions to ensure compliance with section 42 of the Internal
Revenue Code or section 1602 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of
2009, Public Law 111-5, to sustain the long-term viability of buildings funded
by a no-interest loan under this section.

(e) The corporation may collect reasonable
fees from the owner of a qualified low-income building to cover expenses
associated with the performance of the corporation's duties under this section
and may retain an agent or other private contractor to satisfy the requirements
of this section.

(f) If the owner is not in default, the
corporation may forgive the amount remaining under the no-interest loan to the
owner of the qualified low-income building after thirty years.

(g) For purposes of this section,
"qualified low-income building" shall have the same meaning as used
in section 42(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. [L 2011, c 158, §2]

Note

Section applies to qualified low-income buildings placed in
service from January 1, 2012. L 2011, c 158, §5.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next